Vermont, session 2025-2026, S132.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4078 is added to read:
§ 4078. HEALTH CARE SHARING PLAN OR ARRANGEMENT;
REPORTING AND CERTIFICATION
(a) A person who is not authorized by the Commissioner under chapter
101, 123, 125, or 139 of this title to offer insurance in this State and who offers
or intends to offer a plan or arrangement to facilitate payment or
reimbursement of health care costs or services for residents of this State,
regardless of whether the person is domiciled in this State or another state,
shall submit to the Commissioner on or after October 1, 2025 and on or after
March 1 each year thereafter:
(1) the following information:
(A) the total number of individuals and households that participated
in the plan or arrangement in this State in the immediately preceding calendar
year;
(B) the total number of employer groups that participated in the plan
or arrangement in this State in the immediately preceding calendar year,
specifying the total number of participating individuals in each participating
employer group;
(C) if the person offers a plan or arrangement in other states, the total
number of participants in the plan or arrangement nationally;
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 3 of 8
(D) any contracts the person has entered into with providers in this
State who provide health care services to plan or arrangement participants;
(E) the total amount of fees, dues, or other payments collected by the
person in the immediately preceding calendar year from individuals, employer
groups, or others who participated in the plan or arrangement, specifying the
percentage of fees, dues, or other payments retained by the person for
administrative expenses;
(F) the total dollar amount of requests for reimbursement of health
care costs or services that were submitted in this State in the immediately
preceding calendar year by plan or arrangement participants or providers who
provided health care services to plan or arrangement participants;
(G) the total dollar amount of requests for reimbursement of health
care costs or services that were submitted in this State and were determined to
qualify for reimbursement under the plan or arrangement in the immediately
preceding calendar year;
(H) the total dollar amount of payments made to providers in this
State in the immediately preceding calendar year for health care services that
were provided to or received by plan or arrangement participants;
(I) the total dollar amount of reimbursements made to plan or
arrangement participants in this State in the immediately preceding calendar
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 4 of 8
year for health care services provided to or received by a plan or arrangement
participant;
(J) the total number of requests for reimbursement of health care
costs or services submitted in this State in the immediately preceding calendar
year that were denied, expressed as a percentage of total reimbursement
requests submitted in that calendar year, and the total number of
reimbursement request denials that were appealed;
(K) the total dollar amount of health care expenses submitted in this
State by plan or arrangement participants or providers in the immediately
preceding calendar year that qualify for reimbursement pursuant to the plan or
arrangement criteria but that, as of the end of that calendar year, have not been
reimbursed, excluding any amounts that the plan or arrangement participants
incurring the health care costs must pay before receiving reimbursement under
the plan or arrangement;
(L) the estimated number of plan or arrangement participants the
person anticipates in this State in the next calendar year, specifying the number
of individuals, households, employer groups, and employees;
(M) a list of other states in which the person offers a plan or
arrangement;
(N) a list of any third parties, other than a licensed insurance
producer, that are associated with or assist the person in offering or enrolling
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 5 of 8
participants in this State in the plan or arrangement, copies of any training
materials provided to a third party, and a detailed accounting of any
commissions or other feeds or remuneration paid to a third party in the
immediately preceding calendar year for:
(i) marketing, promoting, or enrolling participants in a plan or
arrangement offered by the person in this State; or
(ii) operating, managing, or administering a plan or arrangement
offered by the person in this State;
(O) the total number of licensed insurance producers that are
associated with or assist the person in offering or enrolling participants in this
State in the plan or arrangement, the total number of participants enrolled in
the plan or arrangement through a licensed insurance producer, copies of any
training materials provided to a producer, and a detailed accounting of any
commissions or other fees or remuneration paid to a producer in the
immediately preceding calendar year for marketing, promoting, or enrolling
participants in a plan or arrangement offered by the person in this State;
(P) copies of any consumer-facing and marketing materials used in
this State in promoting the person’s plan or arrangement, including plan or
arrangement descriptions, benefit descriptions, and other materials that explain
the plan or arrangement;
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 6 of 8
(Q) the name, mailing address, email address, and telephone number
of an individual serving as a contact for the person in this State;
(R) a list of any parent companies, subsidiaries, and other names that
the person has operated under at any time within the immediately preceding
five calendar years; and
(S) an organizational chart of the person and a list of the officers and
directors of the person; and
(2) a certification by an officer of the person that, to the best of the
person’s good-faith knowledge and belief, the information submitted is
accurate and satisfies the requirements of this subsection.
(b)(1) If a person subject to the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section fails to submit the information required by that subsection, the
submission is incomplete. The Commissioner shall make a determination of
completeness not later than 45 days after the submission is received. If the
Commissioner has not informed the person of any deficiencies in the
submission within 45 days after receiving the submission, the submission is
considered complete.
(2)(A) If the Commissioner determines that a person has failed to
comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the
Commissioner shall:
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 7 of 8
(i) notify the person that the submission is incomplete and
enumerate in the notification each deficiency found in the person’s submission;
and
(ii) allow the person 30 days after notice of the incomplete
submission to remedy the deficiency found in the submission.
(B) If the person does not remedy the deficiency within the 30-day
period, the Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty not to exceed
$5,000.00 per day.
(C) If the person does not remedy the deficiency or deficiencies
within 30 days after the initial administrative penalty is imposed, the
Commissioner may issue cease and desist order pursuant to section 2110 of
this title.
(c) On or before April 1, 2026 and on or before each October 1 thereafter,
the Commissioner shall:
(1) prepare a written report summarizing the information submitted by
persons pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) post the report on the Department’s website, along with accurate and
evidence-based information about the persons who submitted information
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including how consumers may file
complaints.
VT LEG #379182 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.132
2025 Page 8 of 8
(d) The Commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379182 v.1